Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1133.
do enact as follows:SB1133,11Section 1. 973.01 (2) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,2,62973.01 (2) (d) Minimum and maximum term of extended supervision. (intro.) 3The term of extended supervision may not be less than 25 percent of the length of 4the term of confinement in prison imposed under par. (b) or 5 years, whichever is 5less, and, for a classified felony, is subject to whichever of the following limits is 6applicable:SB1133,27Section 2. 973.01 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is repealed.SB1133,38Section 3. 973.01 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB1133,49Section 4. 973.01 (2) (d) 3. of the statutes is repealed.SB1133,510Section 5. 973.01 (2) (d) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,2,1211973.01 (2) (d) 4. For a Class B, C, D, E, F, or G felony, the term of extended 12supervision may not exceed 5 years.SB1133,613Section 6. 973.01 (2) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB1133,3,214973.01 (2) (e) Consecutive or concurrent sentences. The combined total term of 1extended supervision following any consecutively or concurrently served terms of 2confinement in prison may not exceed 5 years.SB1133,73Section 7. 973.09 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,3,154973.09 (1) (a) Except as provided in par. (c) or if probation is prohibited for a 5particular offense by statute, if a person is convicted of a crime, the court, by order, 6may withhold sentence or impose sentence under s. 973.15 and stay its execution, 7and in either case place the person on probation to the department for a stated 8period, stating in the order the reasons therefor. The court may impose any 9conditions which appear to be reasonable and appropriate. The period of probation 10may be made consecutive to a sentence on a different charge, whether imposed at 11the same time or previously, but the court may not impose consecutive periods of 12probation or terms of extended supervision followed by a period of probation that 13exceed a combined total of 5 years of supervision. If the court imposes a term of 14probation under sub. (2) (a) 1. or 2. or (b) 2., it shall place its reasons for doing so on 15the record.SB1133,816Section 8. 973.09 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,3,2217973.09 (2) (a) 2. If the probationer is convicted of not less than 2 nor more 18than 4 misdemeanors at the same time, the maximum original term of probation 19may be increased by one year, except that the term of probation may not exceed 5 20years. If the probationer is convicted of 5 or more misdemeanors at the same time, 21the maximum original term of probation may be increased by 2 years, except that 22the term of probation may not exceed 5 years.SB1133,923Section 9. 973.09 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,4,324973.09 (2) (b) 2. If the probationer is convicted of 2 or more crimes, including 1at least one felony, at the same time, the maximum original term of probation may 2be increased by one year for each felony conviction, except that the term of probation 3may not exceed 5 years.SB1133,104Section 10. 973.09 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1133,4,85973.09 (3) (a) Prior to the expiration of any probation period, the court, for 6cause and by order, may extend probation for a stated period or modify the terms 7and conditions thereof, except that no term of probation, as extended, may exceed 5 8years.SB1133,4,99